Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Part 10

Permanent Register of Respondents

12-3-1001. Register — Prerequisite for respondents.

No person, firm or corporation shall be considered for contract award by the central procurement office under this chapter or under the rules and regulations established by the central procurement office, unless and until such person, firm, or corporation makes proper application to the central procurement office, as prescribed by rule or policy approved by the procurement commission, to be placed upon the permanent register of respondents. The central procurement office shall establish and maintain the register under and in compliance with the rules and regulations adopted by the procurement commission.

Acts 1953, ch. 163, § 20 (Williams, § 370.29); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 12-310,12-3-103; Acts 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, § 5; T.C.A. §12-3-701; Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 59.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 10, §§12-3-1001 —12-3-1012, was transferred to title 12, ch. 3, part 12, and former title 12, ch. 3, part 7, §§12-3-701 —12-7-704, was transferred to this part by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 59-62 and 68-70, effective July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 10 to title 12, ch. 3, part 12, and transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 7 to this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-1002. Application for qualification as respondents.

All such applications by prospective respondents shall contain:

A verified statement by the applicant disclosing and setting forth the types or classes of goods or services which the applicant desires to furnish and is able to furnish to the state or any state agency;

A statement disclosing whether such applicant will furnish such goods or services as a manufacturer, dealer, agent, distributor, factor, or otherwise; and

Such other information as may be required by the central procurement office to establish the ability of the applicant to perform any future undertaking for the state.

Acts 1953, ch. 163, § 20 (Williams, § 370.29); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 12-311,12-3-104; T.C.A. §12-3-702; Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 60.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 10, §§12-3-1001 —12-3-1012 was transferred to title 12, ch. 3, part 12, and former title 12, ch. 3, part 7, §§12-3-701 —12-7-704, was transferred to this part by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 59-62 and 68-70, effective July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 10 to title 12, ch. 3, part 12, and transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 7 to this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-1003. Permanent mailing list of respondents.

The central procurement office shall establish and maintain from the permanent register of respondents a permanent mailing list, which shall include the names and mailing addresses of all interested respondents.

Acts 1953, ch. 163, § 21 (Williams, § 370.30); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 12-312,12-3-105; T.C.A. §12-3-703; Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 61.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 10, §§12-3-1001 —12-3-1012 was transferred to title 12, ch. 3, part 12, and former title 12, ch. 3, part 7, §§12-3-701 —12-7-704, was transferred to this part by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 59-62 and 68-70, effective July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 10 to title 12, ch. 3, part 12 and transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 7 to this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

Attorney General Opinions. A municipality or county is not authorized to purchase a used or secondhand item from a private individual or entity without public advertisement and competitive bidding following a valuation of the item based on advertised prices for similar used and secondhand items listed for sale on websites. OAG 13-44, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 45 (6/10/13).

12-3-1004. Distributing and posting solicitations and responses electronically.

Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to the contrary, the central procurement office may satisfy any requirement for mailing by distributing solicitations electronically and posting solicitations to the central procurement office internet website. In addition, the central procurement office may receive responses electronically. In order to assure the fullest possible participation of small businesses and minority-owned businesses, the central procurement office shall not require such small businesses and minority-owned businesses to receive or respond to solicitations electronically.

Acts 1999, ch. 382, § 3; T.C.A. §12-3-704; Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 62.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 10, §§12-3-1001 —12-3-1012 was transferred to title 12, ch. 3, part 12, and former title 12, ch. 3, part 7, §§12-3-701 —12-7-704, was transferred to this part by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 59-62 and 68-70, effective July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 10 to title 12, ch. 3, part 12 and transferred former title 12, ch. 3, part 7 to this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.